Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Chapter 16. Probate of Wills and Administration.

Collateral references. —

31 Am. Jur. 2d, Executors and Administrators, § 1 et seq.

79 Am. Jur. 2d, Wills, § 822 et seq.

33 C.J.S., Executors and Administrators, § 1 et seq.

95 C.J.S., Wills, § 307 et seq.

Authority to depart from statutory schedule fixing amount of fees. 40 ALR4th 1189.

Fraud as extending statutory limitations period for contesting will or its probate. 48 ALR4th 1094.

Sufficiency of evidence to support grant of summary judgment in will probate or contest proceedings. 53 ALR4th 561.

Appealability of probate orders allowing or disallowing claims against estate. 84 ALR4th 269.